District of Columbia statutes.
3-1431

Uniform Law Commission.

There is established a District of Columbia Uniform Law Commission (“Commission”). Members of the Commission shall serve as the official commissioners of the District of Columbia to the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws (“NCCUSL”).

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-313, § 2, 57 DCR 12401

History